Utah statutes.
4-32-6.   Duties of person who holds a farm custom slaughter permit.
Each person who holds a farm custom slaughter permit shall:
(1)  keep accurate records of each animal slaughtered including the name,
address, and telephone number of each person for whom livestock is
slaughtered, a full description of each animal slaughtered including brands,
marks, or other identifying marks, proof of ownership, destination of the
carcass for processing, and the date of slaughter;
(2)  require that each animal presented for slaughter bear a farm custom
slaughter tag;
(3)  render the animal to be slaughtered insensible to pain by captive bolt,
gunshot, electric shock, or other humane means before it is shackled, hoisted,
thrown, cast, or cut; and
(4)  stamp and tag the carcass of any slaughtered animal "Not For Sale."
